Arkansas, session 2025, HB1762.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 8-4-103, concerning criminal, civil, and
administrative penalties under the Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control
Act, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(m)(1) If a person permitted to manage industrial wastewater residuals
by land application violates a permit issued under this subchapter resulting
in an over-application or a precipitation related surface land application,
the Division of Environmental Quality shall assess the maximum allowable
penalty as identified in subsection (c) of this section for each violation.
(2) As used in this subsection, "surface land application" means
the spraying, spreading, or incorporating of waste into or onto the land,
excluding injection of waste into the land.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Land application of industrial wastewater
residuals rule.
*JMB511*
04-14-2025 17:35:08 JMB511

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 H4/9/25 S4/14/25 HB1762
(a) The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall begin
the process to promulgate a rule to authorize no-discharge land application
permits of industrial waste.
(b) Until the rule described under subsection (a) of this section is
effective, the Division of Environmental Quality shall continue the same
processes and procedures regarding land application permits.

/s/Hall




























04-14-2025 17:35:08 JMB511